Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202553-101
Act, how cited.

Sections 53-101 to 53-1,122 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 1, p. 373;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-301;

R.S.1943, § 53-101;

Laws 1988, LB 490, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 901, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 70, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 441, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 781, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 582, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 183, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 332, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1292, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 973, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 114, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 845, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB549, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB578, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB232, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB355, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB258, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB407, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB824, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1130, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB118, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB330, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB734, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB274, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB1204, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB376, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB685, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB478, § 1.

The Nebraska Liquor Control Act empowers the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission to include conditions on a liquor license if those restrictions are consistent with the purpose of the act and are reasonably necessary to the protection of the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the State of Nebraska and to the promotion and fostering of temperance in the consumption of alcohol. Abay, L.L.C. v. Nebraska Liquor Control Comm., 303 Neb. 214, 927 N.W.2d 780 (2019).

Liquor Control Act provides comprehensive authority and procedure relating to the granting, renewing, or revoking of liquor licenses without recourse to courts. Leeman v. Vocelka, 149 Neb. 702, 32 N.W.2d 274 (1948).